Utah statutes.
78A-6-304.   Petition filed.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "petition" means a petition to commence
proceedings in a juvenile court alleging that a child is:
(a)  abused;
(b)  neglected; or
(c)  dependent.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), any interested person may file a
petition.
(b)  A person described in Subsection (2)(a) shall make a referral with the
division before the person files a petition.
(3)  If the child who is the subject of a petition is removed from the child's
home by the division, the petition shall be filed on or before the date of the
initial shelter hearing described in Section 78A-6-306.
(4)  The petition shall be verified, and contain all of the following:
(a)  the name, age, and address, if any, of the child upon whose behalf the
petition is brought;
(b)  the names and addresses, if known to the petitioner, of both parents and
any guardian of the child;
(c)  a concise statement of facts, separately stated, to support the
conclusion that the child upon whose behalf the petition is being brought is
abused, neglected, or dependent; and
(d)  a statement regarding whether the child is in protective custody, and if
so, the date and precise time the child was taken into protective custody.
